voikko-fi/vvfst/poikkeavat-sukija.lexc
! Voikko-fi, suomen kielen muoto-opin kuvaus.
!
! Tekijänoikeus © 2006 - 2025 Hannu Väisänen
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute it and/or modify
! it under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation; either version 2, or (at your option)
! any later version.
!
! This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful, but
! WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
! MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the GNU
! General Public License for more details.
!
! You should have received a copy of the GNU General Public License
! along with this program; see the file COPYING.  If not, write to the
! Free Software Foundation, Inc., 51 Franklin Street, Fifth Floor, Boston, MA
! 02110-1301, USA.

LEXICON SukijaMennä_ä
KestämänTekijäpääteHeikko_ä ;
[Tk][Ap][P2][Ny][Eb]:  LiitesanaKinPaHan_ä ;

LEXICON SukijaTulla_a
KestämänTekijäpääteHeikko_a ;
[Tk][Ap][P2][Ny][Eb]:  LiitesanaKinPaHan_a ;

LEXICON SukijaRangaista_a
gas:gas Nuolaista_w_a ;
kas:kas Nuolaista_s_a ;
kas:kas Johdin_U_arvelu_a ;

LEXICON SukijaRuoka
u:u NimisanaYhteisetMonikonPaikallissijat_a ;

LEXICON SukijaHerttua
NimisanaApila_m_a ;

LEXICON SukijaLohi
[Sg][Nm]t:t NimisanaMonikonGenetiiviEnJatko_a ;

LEXICON SukijaOmistusliite_a_in
Omistusliite_a ;
[O1y]in:in Liitesana_a ;

LEXICON SukijaTuta
[Tn1]takse:takse SukijaOmistusliite_a_in ;
[Tn2]ten:ten Liitesana_a ;

LEXICON SukijaItte
te@P.YS_EI_JATKOA.ON@@D.YS_ALKANUT@:te@P.YS_EI_JATKOA.ON@@D.YS_ALKANUT@ NimisanaYhteisetYksikönPaikallissijat_ä	;
tte[Sg][Ny]@P.YS_EI_JATKOA.ON@@D.YS_ALKANUT@n:tten@P.YS_EI_JATKOA.ON@@D.YS_ALKANUT@ Liitesana_ä ;
te[Sg][Ny]@P.YS_EI_JATKOA.ON@@D.YS_ALKANUT@n:ten@P.YS_EI_JATKOA.ON@@D.YS_ALKANUT@ Liitesana_ä ;
tte@P.YS_EI_JATKOA.ON@@D.YS_ALKANUT@:tte@P.YS_EI_JATKOA.ON@@D.YS_ALKANUT@ NimisanaYhteisetYksikönPaikallissijat_ä	;
[Sn][Ny]te@P.YS_EI_JATKOA.ON@@D.YS_ALKANUT@:te@P.YS_EI_JATKOA.ON@@D.YS_ALKANUT@ NimisanaYhteisetYksikönPaikallissijat_ä	;
[Sn][Ny]tte@P.YS_EI_JATKOA.ON@@D.YS_ALKANUT@:tte@P.YS_EI_JATKOA.ON@@D.YS_ALKANUT@ NimisanaYhteisetYksikönPaikallissijat_ä	;
[Sp][Ny]tteä:tteä Liitesana_ä ;
[Ses][Ny]ttenä:ttenä Liitesana_ä ;

LEXICON SukijaKiiru
[Sg][Ny]hun:hun NimisanaYksikönGenetiivinJatko_a ;
[Sp][Ny]a:a NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Sp][Ny]uta:uta NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Sn][Nm]t:t Liitesana_a ;
[Sill][Ny]use:use   NimisanaLiOlN_a ;
[Sill][Ny]huse:huse NimisanaLiOlN_a ;
[Sill][Nm]hisi:hisi NimisanaLiOlN_a ;
NimisanaYhteisetYksikönPaikallissijat_a ;
NimisanaYhteisetHTaivutusmuodot_a ;
[Ssti]sti:sti     LoppuLiitesana_a ;
[Ssti]husti:husti LoppuLiitesana_a ;

LEXICON SukijaNeiti
[Sg][Ny]tin:tin   Liitesana_a ;
?NotLaatusana     [Sn][Ny]te:te Omistusliite_ä	;
[Sp][Ny]ttä:ttä   NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ses][Ny]tenä:tenä NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ses][Ny]nnä:nnä   NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
de:de             NimisanaYhteisetYksikönPaikallissijat_ä ;
ti:ti             NimisanaYhteisetYksikönPaikallissijat_ä ;
[Sill][Ny]tee:tee   NimisanaLiOlN_ä ;
[Sill][Ny]tehe:tehe NimisanaLiOlN_ä ;
[Sn][Nm]det:det     Liitesana_ä	;
[Sill][Nm]tihi:tihi NimisanaLiOlN_ä ;
[Sko][Nm]tine:tine  NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
?Nimisana d:d       Johdin_ittAin_ä ;
?Nimisana de:de     Johdin_tOn_ä ;

LEXICON SukijaOri
[Str][Ny]iksi:iksi    NimisanaLiOlI_a ;
[Ses][Ny]ina:ina      NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Sill][Ny]isee:isee   NimisanaLiOlN_a ;
[Sab][Ny]itta:itta    NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ses][Ny]hina:hina    NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Str][Ny]hiksi:hiksi  NimisanaLiOlI_a ;
[Sill][Ny]hise:hise   NimisanaLiOlN_a ;
[Sn][Nm]it:it         NimisanaMonikonNominatiivinJatko_a;
[Sn][Nm]hit:hit       NimisanaMonikonNominatiivinJatko_a;
[Sg][Nm]itt@D.YS_ALKANUT@:itt@D.YS_ALKANUT@ NimisanaMonikonGenetiiviEnJatko_a ;
[Sg][Nm]tt@D.YS_ALKANUT@:tt@D.YS_ALKANUT@ NimisanaMonikonGenetiiviEnJatko_a ;
[Sill][Nm]ihi:ihi     NimisanaLiOlN_a ;
[Sill][Nm]isii:isii   NimisanaLiOlN_a ;
[Sill][Nm]hisi:hisi   NimisanaLiOlN_a ;
NimisanaYhteisetHTaivutusmuodot_a ;

LEXICON SukijaOriYhdyssana
NimisanaRisti_a ;
[Sg][Nm]iid@D.YS_ALKANUT@:iid@D.YS_ALKANUT@	NimisanaMonikonGenetiiviEnJatko_a	;
[Sp][Ny]itta@D.YS_ALKANUT@:iitta@D.YS_ALKANUT@	NimisanaLiOlV_a	;
[Nm]iita@D.YS_ALKANUT@:iita@D.YS_ALKANUT@	NimisanaLiOlV_a	;
ii@D.YS_ALKANUT@:ii@D.YS_ALKANUT@	SisäpaikallissijatSsaSta_a	;
ii@D.YS_ALKANUT@:ii@D.YS_ALKANUT@	Ulkopaikallissijat_Yks_a	;
i:i SukijaOri;

LEXICON SukijaUrosYksikkö
Omistusliite_a ;
[Sg][Ny]n:n    NimisanaYksikönGenetiivinJatko_a ;
[Ses][Ny]na:na NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
NimisanaYhteisetYksikönPaikallissijat_a ;
[Sn][Nm]t:t NimisanaMonikonNominatiivinJatko_a ;

LEXICON SukijaUksi
[Sp][Ny]sta:sta   NimisanaLiOlV_a	;
[Sg][Nm]st:st     NimisanaMonikonGenetiiviEnJatko_a ;

LEXICON SukijaUrosMonikko
[Sg][Nm]itt:itt  NimisanaMonikonGenetiiviEnJatko_a ;
[Ses][Ny]ina:ina NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
NimisanaYhteisetMonikonPaikallissijat_a ;
[Sko][Nm]ine:ine NimisanaOlVLoppu_a ;

LEXICON SukijaUros
o:o   SukijaUrosYksikkö ;
ho:ho SukijaUrosYksikkö ;
[Ses][Ny]sna:sna    NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Sill][Ny]osee:osee NimisanaLiOlN_a ;
[Sill][Ny]hose:hose NimisanaLiOlN_a ;
[Sg][Nm]hi:hi NimisanaMonikonGenetiiviEnJatko_a ;
[Sg][Nm]id:id NimisanaMonikonGenetiiviEnJatko_a ;
[Sp][Nm]ita:ita NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Sp][Nm]hia:hia NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
SukijaUrosMonikko ;
h:h SukijaUrosMonikko ;
[Sill][Nm]ihi:ihi   NimisanaLiOlN_a ;
[Sill][Nm]isii:isii NimisanaLiOlN_a ;
[Sill][Nm]hisi:hisi NimisanaLiOlN_a ;
[Ssti]osti:osti     Liitesana_a;

LEXICON SukijaVuoka
[Sg][Ny]oan:uan NimisanaYksikönGenetiivinJatko_a	;
[Sg][Ny]oan:okan NimisanaYksikönGenetiivinJatko_a	;

LEXICON SukijaLukusanaKolmattaYhdeksättä
[Bc]kolmatta[Xp][X]:kolmatta       Liitesana_a     ;
[Bc]kolmatta:kolmatta              LukusananJälkiliite     ;
[Bc]neljättä[Xp][X]:neljättä       Liitesana_ä     ;
[Bc]neljättä:neljättä              LukusananJälkiliite     ;
[Bc]viidettä[Xp][X]:viidettä       Liitesana_ä     ;
[Bc]viidettä:viidettä              LukusananJälkiliite     ;
[Bc]kuudetta[Xp][X]:kuudetta       Liitesana_a     ;
[Bc]kuudetta:kuudetta              LukusananJälkiliite     ;
[Bc]seitsemättä[Xp][X]:seitsemättä Liitesana_ä     ;
[Bc]seitsemättä:seitsemättä        LukusananJälkiliite     ;
[Bc]kahdeksatta[Xp][X]:kahdeksatta Liitesana_a    ;
[Bc]kahdeksatta:kahdeksatta        LukusananJälkiliite     ;
[Bc]yhdeksättä[Xp][X]:yhdeksättä   Liitesana_ä     ;
[Bc]yhdeksättä:yhdeksättä          LukusananJälkiliite     ;

LEXICON SukijaJärjestyslukuKolmattaYhdeksättä
[Bc]kolmatta[Xp][X]:kolmatta       Liitesana_a     ;
[Bc]kolmatta:kolmatta              LukusananJälkiliiteJl   ;
[Bc]neljättä[Xp][X]:neljättä       Liitesana_ä     ;
[Bc]neljättä:neljättä              LukusananJälkiliiteJl   ;
[Bc]viidettä[Xp][X]:viidettä       Liitesana_ä     ;
[Bc]viidettä:viidettä              LukusananJälkiliiteJl     ;
[Bc]kuudetta[Xp][X]:kuudetta       Liitesana_a     ;
[Bc]kuudetta:kuudetta              LukusananJälkiliiteJl     ;
[Bc]seitsemättä[Xp][X]:seitsemättä Liitesana_ä     ;
[Bc]seitsemättä:seitsemättä        LukusananJälkiliiteJl     ;
[Bc]kahdeksatta[Xp][X]:kahdeksatta Liitesana_a     ;
[Bc]kahdeksatta:kahdeksatta        LukusananJälkiliiteJl     ;
[Bc]yhdeksättä[Xp][X]:yhdeksättä   Liitesana_ä     ;
[Bc]yhdeksättä:yhdeksättä          LukusananJälkiliiteJl     ;

LEXICON SukijaAsemosanaHän
[Sill][Ny]nehen:nehen     Liitesana_ä     ;
[Sab][Ny]nettä:nettä      Liitesana_ä     ;

LEXICON SukijaAsemosanaKumpi
[Sg][Nm]pain:pain       Liitesana_a ;
[Sko][Nm]pine:pine      Liitesana_a ;

LEXICON SukijaAsemosanaMeTeHe
[Sg][Nm]idän:iän Liitesana_ä ;
[Sg][Nm]idän:ijän Liitesana_ä ;
[Sall][Nm]illen:illen Liitesana_ä ;

LEXICON SukijaAsemosanaMieMä
[Sall][Ny]ullen:ullen Liitesana_a ;

LEXICON SukijaAsemosanaMikä
[Sn][Ny]käs:käs   Loppu ;
[Sg][Ny]nkäs:nkäs Loppu ;
[Sg][Ny]nkäspähän:nkäspähän Loppu ;
[Sp][Ny]täshän:täshän     Loppu ;
[Sp][Ny]täspä:täspä       Loppu ;
[Sp][Ny]tästä:tästä       Loppu ;
[Sp][Ny]tästäpä:tästäpä   Loppu ;
[Str][Ny]ksikäs:ksikäs    Loppu ;
[Sela][Ny]stäkäs:stäkäs   Loppu ;
[Sill][Ny]hinkäs:hinkäs   Loppu ;
[Sill][Ny]nnekkä:nnekkä   Liitesana_ä ;
[Sill][Ny]nnekkäs:nnekkäs Loppu ;
[Sill][Ny]nnekkään:nnekkään Loppu ;
[Sill][Ny]nnekäs:nnekäs     Loppu ;
[Sall][Ny]llekäs:llekäs     Loppu ;
[Sn][Nm]tkäs:tkäs           Loppu ;

LEXICON SukijaAsemosanaMinä
[Sp][Ny]nuu:nuu       Liitesana_a ;
[Sill][Ny]uhun:uhun   Liitesana_a ;
[Sall][Ny]ullen:ullen Liitesana_a ;
[Sab][Ny]utta:utta    Liitesana_a ;

LEXICON SukijaAsemosanaNämä
[Sak][Ny]mät:mät Liitesana_ä ;

LEXICON SukijaAsemosanaTämä 
[Sg][Ny]än:än	Liitesana_ä	;

LEXICON SukijaSuhdesana
[Ld][Xp]ammolla[X]ammolla:ammolla Liitesana_a ;
[Ld][Xp]ammolla[X]ammollansa:ammollansa Liitesana_a ;

LEXICON SukijaPoikkeavat_h
[Lh][Xp]juu[X]juupas:juupas # ;
[Lh][Xp]tuut[X]tuut:tuut # ;
[Lh][Xp]tyyt[X]tyyt:tyyt # ;
